Texas statutes.
UTILITIES CODE

TITLE 3. GAS REGULATION

SUBTITLE B. REGULATION OF TRANSPORTATION AND USE

CHAPTER 124. SUBMETERING TO MOBILE HOME PARKS AND APARTMENT HOUSES

Sec. 124.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Apartment house" means one or more buildings containing more than five dwelling units each of which is rented primarily for nontransient use with rent paid at intervals of one week or longer. The term includes a rented or owner-occupied residential condominium.

(2) "Dwelling unit" means:

(A) one or more rooms that are suitable for occupancy as a residence and that contain kitchen and bathroom facilities; or

(B) a mobile home in a mobile home park.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 166, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 124.002. SUBMETERING. (a) The railroad commission shall adopt rules under which an owner, operator, or manager of a mobile home park or apartment house may purchase natural gas through a master meter for delivery to a dwelling unit in the mobile home park or apartment house using individual submeters to allocate fairly the cost of the gas consumption of each dwelling unit.

(b) In addition to other appropriate safeguards for a resident of a mobile home park or apartment house, the rules must provide that the owner, operator, or manager of the mobile home park or apartment house:

(1) may not deliver natural gas for sale or resale for profit; and

(2) shall maintain adequate records relating to that submetering and make those records available for inspection by the resident during reasonable business hours.

Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 166, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.